California statutes. Penal Code
 diversion at the arraignment. If the defendant is found ineligible for pretrial diversion, the prosecuting attorney shall file with the court a declaration in writing or state for the record the grounds upon which the determination is based, and shall make this information available to the defendant and his or her attorney. The sole remedy of a defendant who is found ineligible for pretrial diversion is a postconviction appeal.

(c) All referrals for pretrial diversion granted by the court pursuant to this chapter shall be made only to programs that have been certified by the county drug program administrator pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 1211) of Title 8, or to programs that provide services at no cost to the participant and have been deemed by the court and the county drug program
 administrator to be credible and effective. The defendant may request to be referred to a program in any county, as long as that program meets the criteria set forth in this subdivision.

(d) Pretrial diversion for an alleged violation of Section 11368 of the Health and Safety Code shall not prohibit any administrative agency from taking disciplinary action against a licensee or from denying a license. This subdivision does not expand or restrict the provisions of Section 1000.4.

(e) Any defendant who is participating in a program authorized in this section may be required to undergo analysis of his or her urine for the purpose of testing for the presence of any drug as part of the program. However, urinalysis results shall not be admissible as a basis for any new
 criminal prosecution or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 778, Sec. 1.   (AB 208)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.1.

(a) If the prosecuting attorney determines that this chapter may be applicable to the defendant, he or she shall advise the defendant and his or her attorney in writing of that determination. This notification shall include all of the following:

(1) A full description of the procedures for pretrial diversion.

(2) A general explanation of the roles and authorities of the probation department, the prosecuting attorney, the program, and the court in the process.

(3) A clear statement that the court may grant pretrial diversion with
 respect to any offense specified in subdivision (a) of Section 1000 that is charged, provided that the defendant pleads not guilty to the charge or charges, waives the right to a speedy trial, to a speedy preliminary hearing, and to a trial by jury, if applicable, and that upon the defendant’s successful completion of a program, as specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1000, the positive recommendation of the program authority and the motion of the defendant, prosecuting attorney, the court, or the probation department, but no sooner than 12 months and no later than 18 months from the date of the defendant’s referral to the program, the court shall dismiss the charge or charges against the defendant.

(4) A clear statement that upon any failure of treatment or condition under the program, or any circumstance specified in Section
 1000.3, the prosecuting attorney or the probation department or the court on its own may make a motion to the court to terminate pretrial diversion and schedule further proceedings as otherwise provided in this code.

(5) An explanation of criminal record retention and disposition resulting from participation in the pretrial diversion program and the defendant’s rights relative to answering questions about his or her arrest and pretrial diversion following successful completion of the program.

(b) If the defendant consents and waives his or her right to a speedy trial, a speedy preliminary hearing, and to a trial by jury, if applicable, the court may refer the case to the probation department or the court may summarily grant pretrial diversion. When directed by the court, the
 probation department shall make an investigation and take into consideration the defendant’s age, employment and service records, educational background, community and family ties, prior controlled substance use, treatment history, if any, demonstrable motivation, and other mitigating factors in determining whether the defendant is a person who would be benefited by education, treatment, or rehabilitation. The probation department shall also determine which programs the defendant would benefit from and which programs would accept the defendant. The probation department shall report its findings and recommendations to the court. The court shall make the final determination regarding education, treatment, or rehabilitation for the defendant. If the court determines that it is appropriate, the court shall grant pretrial diversion if the defendant pleads not guilty to the charge or charges and waives
 the right to a speedy trial, to a speedy preliminary hearing, and to a trial by jury, if applicable.

(c) (1) No statement, or any information procured therefrom, made by the defendant to any probation officer or drug treatment worker, that is made during the course of any investigation conducted by the probation department or treatment program pursuant to subdivision (b), and prior to the reporting of the probation department’s findings and recommendations to the court, shall be admissible in any action or proceeding brought subsequent to the investigation.

(2) No statement, or any information procured therefrom, with respect to the specific offense with which the defendant is charged, that is made to any probation officer or drug program worker subsequent
 to the granting of pretrial diversion shall be admissible in any action or proceeding.

(d) A defendant’s participation in pretrial diversion pursuant to this chapter shall not constitute a conviction or an admission of guilt for any purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 778, Sec. 2.   (AB 208)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.2.

(a) The court shall hold a hearing and, after consideration of any information relevant to its decision, shall determine if the defendant consents to further proceedings under this chapter and if the defendant should be granted pretrial diversion. If the defendant does not consent to participate in pretrial diversion, the proceedings shall continue as in any other case.

(b) At the time that pretrial diversion is granted, any bail bond or undertaking, or deposit in lieu thereof, on file by or on behalf of the defendant shall be exonerated, and the court shall enter an order so directing.

(c) The period during which pretrial diversion is granted shall be for no less than 12 months nor longer than 18 months. However, the defendant may request, and the court shall grant, for good cause shown, an extension of time to complete a program specified in subdivision (c) of Section 1000. Progress reports shall be filed by the probation department with the court as directed by the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 778, Sec. 3.   (AB 208)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.3.

(a) If it appears to the prosecuting attorney, the court, or the probation department that the defendant is performing unsatisfactorily in the assigned program, that the defendant is convicted of an offense that reflects the defendant’s propensity for violence, or that the defendant is convicted of a felony, the prosecuting attorney, the court on its own, or the probation department may make a motion for termination from pretrial diversion.

(b) After notice to the defendant, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether pretrial diversion shall be terminated.

(c) If the court finds that the defendant is not performing satisfactorily in the assigned program, or the court
 finds that the defendant has been convicted of a crime as indicated in subdivision (a), the court shall schedule the matter for further proceedings as otherwise provided in this code.

(d) If the defendant has completed pretrial diversion, at the end of that period, the criminal charge or charges shall be dismissed.

(e) Prior to dismissing the charge or charges or terminating pretrial diversion, the court shall consider the defendant’s ability to pay and whether the defendant has paid a diversion restitution fee pursuant to Section 1001.90, if ordered, and has met their financial obligation to the program, if any.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 39) and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 92, Sec. 40.   (AB 1869)   Effective September 18, 2020.   Operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.4.

(a) Any record filed with the Department of Justice shall indicate the disposition in those cases referred to pretrial diversion pursuant to this chapter. Upon successful completion of a pretrial diversion program, the arrest upon which the
 defendant was diverted shall be deemed to have never occurred and the court may issue an order to seal the records pertaining to the arrest as described in Section 851.92. The defendant may indicate in response to any question concerning his or her prior criminal record that he or she was not arrested or granted pretrial diversion for the offense, except
 as specified in subdivision (c). A record pertaining to an arrest resulting in successful completion of a pretrial diversion program shall not, without the defendant’s consent, be used in any way that could result in the denial of any employment, benefit, license, or certificate, except that, as specified in Section 492 of the Business and Professions Code, successful completion of a pretrial diversion program shall not
 prohibit any agency established under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or under any initiative act referred to in that division, from taking disciplinary action against a licensee or from denying a license for professional misconduct, notwithstanding that evidence of that misconduct may be recorded in a record pertaining to an arrest leading to successful completion of a pretrial diversion program.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any licensing agency listed in Section 144 of the Business and Professions Code may request, and is authorized to receive, from a local or state agency certified records regarding referral to, participation in, successful completion of, and termination from, diversion programs described in this section.

(c) The defendant shall be advised that, regardless of his or her successful completion of the pretrial diversion program, the arrest upon which the pretrial diversion was based may be disclosed by the Department of Justice in
 response to any peace officer application request and that, notwithstanding subdivision (a), this section does not relieve him or her of the obligation to disclose the arrest in response to any direct question contained in any questionnaire or application for a position as a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.

(d) The defendant shall be advised that, regardless of the defendant’s successful completion of a pretrial diversion program, an order to seal records pertaining to an arrest made pursuant to this section has no effect on a criminal justice agency’s ability to access and use those sealed records and information regarding sealed arrests, as described in Section 851.92.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 778, Sec. 5.5.   (AB 208)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.5.

(a) (1) The presiding judge of the superior court, or a judge designated by the presiding judge, together with the district attorney and the public defender, may agree in writing to establish and conduct a preguilty plea drug court program pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, wherein criminal proceedings are suspended without a plea of guilty for designated defendants. The drug court program shall include a regimen of graduated sanctions and rewards, individual and group therapy, urinalysis testing commensurate with treatment needs, close court monitoring and supervision of progress, educational or
 vocational counseling as appropriate, and other requirements as agreed to by the presiding judge or his or her designee, the district attorney, and the public defender. If there is no agreement in writing for a preguilty plea program by the presiding judge or his or her designee, the district attorney, and the public defender, the program shall be operated as a pretrial diversion program as provided in this chapter.

(2) A person charged with a misdemeanor under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11357.5 or paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 11375.5 of the Health and Safety Code shall be eligible to participate in a preguilty plea drug court program established pursuant to this chapter, as set forth in Section 11375.7 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) The provisions of Section 1000.3 and Section 1000.4 regarding satisfactory and unsatisfactory performance in a program shall apply to preguilty plea programs, except as provided in Section 11375.7 of the Health and Safety Code. If the court finds that (1) the defendant is not performing satisfactorily in the assigned program, (2) the defendant is not benefiting from education, treatment, or rehabilitation, (3) the defendant has been convicted of a crime specified in Section 1000.3, or (4) the defendant has engaged in criminal conduct rendering him or her unsuitable for the preguilty plea program, the court shall reinstate the criminal charge or charges. If the defendant has performed satisfactorily during the period of the preguilty plea program, at the end of that period, the criminal charge or charges shall be dismissed and the provisions of Section 1000.4 shall
 apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 778, Sec. 6.   (AB 208)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.6.

(a) A person who is participating in a pretrial diversion program or a preguilty plea program pursuant to this chapter is authorized under the direction of a licensed health care practitioner, to use medications including, but not limited to, methadone, buprenorphine, or levoalphacetylmethadol (LAAM) to treat substance use disorders if the participant allows release of his or her medical records to the court presiding over the participant’s preguilty plea or pretrial diversion program for the limited purpose of determining whether or not the participant is using such medications under the direction of a licensed health care practitioner and is in compliance with the pretrial diversion or
 preguilty plea program rules.

(b) If the conditions specified in subdivision (a) are met, the use by a participant of medications to treat substance use disorders shall not be the sole reason for exclusion from a pretrial diversion or preguilty plea program. A patient who uses medications to treat substance use disorders and participates in a preguilty plea or pretrial diversion program shall comply with all court program rules.

(c) A person who is participating in a pretrial diversion program or preguilty plea program pursuant to this chapter who uses medications to treat substance use disorders shall present to the court a declaration from his or her health care practitioner, or his or her health care practitioner’s authorized representative, that the person
 is currently under their care.

(d) Urinalysis results that only establish that a person described in this section has ingested medication duly prescribed to that person by his or her physician or psychiatrist, or medications used to treat substance use disorders, shall not be considered a violation of the terms of the pretrial diversion or preguilty plea program under this chapter.

(e) Except as provided in subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, this section does not affect any other law governing diversion programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 778, Sec. 7.   (AB 208)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.65.

This chapter does not affect a pretrial diversion program provided pursuant to Chapter 2.7 (commencing with Section 1001).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 778, Sec. 8.   (AB 208)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.55. Deferred Entry of Judgment Pilot Program [1000.7. - 1000.7.]

1000.7.

(a) The following counties may establish a pilot program pursuant to this section to operate a deferred entry of judgment pilot program for eligible defendants described in subdivision (b):

(1) County of Butte.

(2) County of Nevada.

(3) County of Santa Clara.

(b) A defendant may participate in a deferred entry of judgment pilot program within the county’s juvenile hall if that person is charged with committing a felony offense, other than the offenses listed under subdivision (d), pleads guilty to the
 charge or charges, and the probation department determines that the person meets all of the following requirements:

(1) Is 18 years of age or older, but under 21 years of age, on the date the offense was committed. A defendant who is 21 years of age or older, but under 25 years of age, on the date the offense was committed, may participate in the program with the approval of the multidisciplinary team established pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (m).

(2) Is suitable for the program after evaluation using a risk assessment tool, as described in subdivision (c).

(3) Shows the ability to benefit from services generally reserved for delinquents, including, but not limited to, cognitive behavioral therapy, other
 mental health services, and age-appropriate educational, vocational, and supervision services, that are currently deployed under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(4) Meets the rules of the juvenile hall developed in accordance with the applicable regulations set forth in Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.

(5) Does not have a prior or current conviction for committing an offense listed under subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7, subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, or subdivision (b) of Section 707 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(6) Is not required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(c) The probation department, in consultation with the superior court, district attorney, and sheriff of the county or the governmental body charged with operating the county jail, shall develop an evaluation process using a risk assessment tool to determine eligibility for the program.

(d) A defendant is ineligible for the program if they are required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Chapter 5.5 (commencing with Section 290) of Title 9 of Part 1 or have been convicted of one or more of the following offenses:

(1) An offense listed under subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7.

(2) An offense listed under subdivision (c) of Section 667.5.

(3) An offense
 listed under subdivision (b) of Section 707 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(e) The court shall grant deferred entry of judgment if an eligible defendant consents to participate in the program, waives the right to a speedy trial or a speedy preliminary hearing, pleads guilty to the charge or charges, and waives time for the pronouncement of judgment.

(f) (1) If the probation department determines that the defendant is ineligible for the deferred entry of judgment pilot program or the defendant does not consent to participate in the program, the proceedings shall continue as in any other case.

(2) If it appears to the probation department that the defendant is performing unsatisfactorily in the
 program as a result of the commission of a new crime or the violation of any of the rules of the juvenile hall, or that the defendant is not benefiting from the services in the program, the probation department may make a motion for entry of judgment. After notice to the defendant, the court shall hold a hearing to determine whether judgment should be entered. If the court finds that the defendant is performing unsatisfactorily in the program or that the defendant is not benefiting from the services in the program, the court shall render a finding of guilt to the charge or charges pleaded, enter judgment, and schedule a sentencing hearing as otherwise provided in this code, and the probation department, in consultation with the county sheriff, shall remove the defendant from the program and return the defendant to custody in county jail. The mechanism of when and how the defendant is moved from
 custody in juvenile hall to custody in a county jail shall be determined by the local multidisciplinary team specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (m).

(3) If the defendant has performed satisfactorily during the period in which deferred entry of judgment was granted, at the end of that period, the court shall dismiss the criminal charge or charges.

(g) A defendant shall serve no longer than one year in custody within a county’s juvenile hall pursuant to the program.

(h) The probation department shall develop a plan for reentry services, including, but not limited to, housing, employment, and education services, as a component of the program.

(i) The
 probation department shall submit data relating to the effectiveness of the program to the Division of Recidivism Reduction and Re-Entry, within the Department of Justice, including recidivism rates for program participants as compared to recidivism rates for similar populations in the adult system within the county.

(j) A defendant participating in this program shall not come into contact with minors within the juvenile hall for any purpose, including, but not limited to, housing, recreation, or education.

(k) Before establishing a pilot program pursuant to this section, the county shall apply to the Board of State and Community Corrections for approval of a county institution as a suitable place for confinement for the purpose of the pilot program. The board shall review and
 approve or deny the application of the county within 30 days of receiving notice of this proposed use. In its review, the board shall take into account the available programming, capacity, and safety of the institution as a place for the confinement and rehabilitation of individuals within the jurisdiction of the criminal court and those within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(l) The Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall review a county’s pilot program to ensure compliance with requirements of the federal Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 1974 (34 U.S.C. Sec. 11101 et seq.), as amended, relating
 to “sight and sound” separation between juveniles and adult inmates. The Office of Youth and Community Restoration shall communicate the results of any review to the Board of State and Community Corrections within 30 days after the review is complete.

(m) (1) This section applies to a defendant who would otherwise serve time in custody in a county jail. Participation in a program pursuant to this section shall not be authorized as an alternative to a sentence involving community supervision.

(2) Each county shall establish a multidisciplinary team that shall meet periodically to review and discuss the implementation, practices, and impact of the program. The team shall include representatives
 from all of the following:

(A) The probation department.

(B) The district attorney’s office.

(C) The public defender’s office.

(D) The sheriff’s department.

(E) Courts located in the county.

(F) The county board of supervisors.

(G) The county health and human services department.

(H) A youth advocacy group.

(n) (1) A county that establishes a
 pilot program pursuant to this section shall conduct an evaluation of the pilot program’s impact and effectiveness in their county. The evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, evaluating the pilot program’s impact on sentencing and impact on opportunities for community
 supervision, monitoring the program’s effect on minors in the juvenile facility, if any, and its effectiveness with respect to program participants, including outcome-related data for program participants compared to young adult offenders sentenced for comparable crimes.

(2) Each county shall prepare a report based on the evaluation conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) and shall submit the report to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Public Safety, no later than December 31, 2027.

(3) Counties may contract with an independent entity, including, but not limited to, the Regents of the University of California, for the purposes of conducting the evaluation and preparing the report pursuant to this subdivision.

(4) To continue to participate in the pilot program, authorized counties shall comply with the reporting requirement in paragraph (2).

(o) This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2029, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 394, Sec. 1.   (AB 1258)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.    Note: Repeal affects Chapter 2.55, consisting of this section.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.6. Deferred Entry of Judgment Reentry Program [1000.8. - 1000.10.]

1000.8.

A superior court, with the concurrence of the prosecuting attorney of the county, may create a “Back on Track” deferred entry of judgment reentry program aimed at preventing recidivism among first-time nonviolent felony drug offenders. No defendant who has been convicted of a violation of an offense enumerated in subdivision (c) of Section 290 or in Section 1192.7 shall be eligible for the program established in this chapter. When creating this program, the prosecuting attorney, together with the presiding judge and a representative of the criminal defense bar selected by the presiding judge of the superior court may agree to establish a “Back on Track” deferred entry of judgment program pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The agreement shall specify which low-level nonviolent felony drug offenses under the Health and
 Safety Code will be eligible for the program and a process for selecting participants. The program shall have the following characteristics:

(a) A dedicated calendar.

(b) Leadership by a superior court judicial officer who is assigned by the presiding judge.

(c) Clearly defined eligibility criteria to enter the program and clearly defined criteria for completion of the program.

(d) Legal incentives for defendants to successfully complete the program, including dismissal or reduction of criminal charges upon successful completion of the program.

(e) Close supervision to hold participants accountable to program compliance, including the use of graduated sanctions and frequent, ongoing
 appearances before the court regarding participants’ program progress and compliance with all program terms and conditions. The court may use available legal mechanisms, including return to custody if necessary, for failure to comply with the supervised plan.

(f) Appropriate transitional programming for participants, based on available resources from county and community service providers and other agencies. The transitional programming may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Vocational training, readiness, and placement.

(2) Educational training, including assistance with acquiring a G.E.D. or high school diploma and assistance with admission to college.

(3) Substance abuse treatment.

(4) Assistance with obtaining identification cards and driver’s licenses.

(5) Parenting skills training and assistance in becoming compliant with child support obligations.

(g) The program may develop a local, public-private partnership between law enforcement, government agencies, private employers, and community-based organizations for the purpose of creating meaningful employment opportunities for participants and to take advantage of incentives for hiring program participants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 372, Sec. 4.   (AB 750)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.9.

The prosecuting attorney shall determine whether a defendant is eligible for participation in the deferred entry of judgment reentry program.

(a) If the prosecuting attorney determines that this section may be applicable to the defendant, he or she shall advise the defendant and his or her attorney in writing of that determination. This notification shall include the following:

(1) A full description of the procedures for deferred entry of judgment.

(2) A general explanation of the role and authority of the prosecuting attorney, the program, and the court in the process.

(3) A clear statement that in lieu of trial, the court may grant deferred entry of judgment with respect to the current crime or crimes charged if the defendant pleads guilty to each charge and waives time for the pronouncement of judgment, and that, upon the defendant’s successful completion of the program and the motion of the prosecuting attorney, the court will dismiss the charge or charges against the defendant and the provisions of Sections 851.90 and 1203.4 will apply.

(4) A clear statement that failure to comply with any condition under the program may result in the prosecuting attorney or the court making a motion for entry of judgment, whereupon the court will render a finding of guilty to the charge or charges pled, enter judgment, and schedule a sentencing hearing as otherwise provided in this code.

(5) An explanation of criminal record retention and
 disposition resulting from participation in the deferred entry of judgment program and the defendant’s rights relative to answering questions about his or her arrest and deferred entry of judgment following successful completion of the program.

(b) If the prosecuting attorney determines that the defendant is eligible for the program, the prosecuting attorney shall state for the record the grounds upon which the determination is based and shall make this information available to the defendant and his or her attorney. This procedure is intended to allow the court to set the hearing for deferred entry of judgment at the arraignment.

(c) If the prosecuting attorney determines that the defendant is ineligible for the program, the prosecuting attorney shall state for the record the grounds upon which the determination is based and shall make this information available to the defendant
 and his or her attorney. The sole remedy of a defendant who is found ineligible for deferred entry of judgment is a postconviction appeal. If the prosecuting attorney does not deem the defendant eligible, or the defendant does not consent to participate, the proceedings shall continue as in any other case.

(d) Upon a motion by the prosecuting attorney for an entry of judgment, before entering a judgment of guilty, the court may hold a hearing to determine whether the defendant has failed to comply with the program and should be terminated from the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 372, Sec. 4.   (AB 750)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.10.

The following provisions apply to this chapter:

(a) A defendant’s plea of guilty shall not constitute a conviction for any purpose unless a judgment of guilty is entered pursuant to Section 1000.3.

(b) Counties that opt to create a deferred entry of judgment reentry program pursuant to Section 1000.8 of the Penal Code shall not seek state reimbursement for costs associated with the implementation, development, or operation of that program.

(c) To the extent county resources beyond those of the superior court and the district attorney are needed to implement the program, those agencies shall consult with the county board of supervisors
 and other impacted county agencies to assess resources before program implementation.

(d) Local law enforcement agencies and counties administering the programs may seek federal or private funding for the purpose of implementing the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 372, Sec. 4.   (AB 750)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.65. Child Abuse and Neglect Counseling [1000.12. - 1000.17.]

1000.12.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that nothing in this chapter deprive a prosecuting attorney of the ability to prosecute any person who is suspected of committing any crime in which a minor is a victim of an act of physical abuse or neglect to the fullest extent of the law, if the prosecuting attorney so chooses.

(b) In lieu of prosecuting a person suspected of committing any crime, involving a minor victim, of an act of physical abuse or neglect, the prosecuting attorney may refer that person to the county department in charge of public social services or the probation department for counseling or psychological treatment and such other services as the department deems necessary. The prosecuting attorney shall seek the advice of the county department in charge of public social services or the probation department in determining whether or not to make the referral.

(c) This section shall not apply to any person who is charged with sexual abuse or molestation of a minor victim, or any sexual offense involving force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the minor victim or another person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 477, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1000.17.

If the person is referred pursuant to this chapter he or she shall be responsible for paying the administrative cost of the referral and the expense of such counseling as determined by the county department responsible for public social services or the probation department. The administrative cost of the referral shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100) for any person referred pursuant to this chapter for an offense punishable as a felony and shall not exceed fifty dollars ($50) for any person referred pursuant to the chapter for an offense punishable as a misdemeanor. The department shall take into consideration the ability of the referred party to pay and no such person shall be denied counseling services because of his or her inability to pay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 804, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.7. Misdemeanor Diversion [1001. - 1001.9.]

1001.

It is the intent of the Legislature that this chapter, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1000) of this title, or any other provision of law not be construed to preempt other current or future pretrial or precomplaint diversion programs. It is also the intent of the Legislature that current or future posttrial diversion programs not be preempted, except as provided in Section 13201 or 13352.5 of the Vehicle Code. Sections 1001.2 to 1001.9, inclusive, of this chapter apply only to pretrial diversion programs as defined in Section 1001.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 537, Sec. 9.   (SB 239)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.1.

As used in Sections 1001.2 to 1001.9, inclusive, of this chapter, pretrial diversion refers to the procedure of postponing prosecution of an offense filed as a misdemeanor either temporarily or permanently at any point in the judicial process from the point at which the accused is charged until adjudication.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 537, Sec. 10.   (SB 239)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.2.

(a) This chapter shall not apply to any pretrial diversion or posttrial programs for the treatment of problem drinking or alcoholism utilized for persons convicted of one or more offenses under Section 23152 or 23153 or former Section 23102 of the Vehicle Code or to pretrial diversion programs established pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1000) of this title nor shall this chapter be deemed to authorize any pretrial diversion or posttrial programs for persons alleged to have committed violation of Section 23152 or 23153 of the Vehicle Code.

(b) The district attorney of each county shall review annually any diversion program established pursuant to this chapter, and no program shall continue without the approval of the district attorney. No person shall be diverted under a program unless it has been approved by the district attorney. Nothing in this subdivision shall authorize the prosecutor to determine whether a particular defendant shall be diverted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.3.

At no time shall a defendant be required to make an admission of guilt as a prerequisite for placement in a pretrial diversion program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.4.

A divertee is entitled to a hearing, as set forth by law, before his or her pretrial diversion can be terminated for cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.5.

No statement, or information procured therefrom, made by the defendant in connection with the determination of his or her eligibility for diversion, and no statement, or information procured therefrom, made by the defendant, subsequent to the granting of diversion or while participating in such program, and no information contained in any report made with respect thereto, and no statement or other information concerning the defendant’s participation in such program shall be admissible in any action or proceeding. However, if a divertee is recommended for termination for cause, information regarding his or her participation in such program may be used for purposes of the termination proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.6.

At such time that a defendant’s case is diverted, any bail bond or undertaking, or deposit in lieu thereof, on file by or on behalf of the defendant shall be exonerated, and the court shall enter an order so directing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.7.

If the divertee has performed satisfactorily during the period of diversion, the criminal charges shall be dismissed at the end of the period of diversion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.8.

Any record filed with the Department of Justice shall indicate the disposition of those cases diverted pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 42, Sec. 2.   Effective February 17, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

1001.9.
